Louisiana, session 2026, SB278.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:667(I)(1)(b) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§667. Seizure of license; circumstances; temporary license
* * *
I.(1) In addition to any other provision of law, an ignition interlock device
shall be installed in any motor vehicle operated by any of the following persons
whose driver's license has been suspended in connection with the following
circumstances as a condition of the reinstatement of such person's driver's license:
* * *
(b) Any person who has submitted to an approved chemical test for
intoxication where the results indicate a blood alcohol level of 0.08 percent or above
and whose driver's license has been suspended in accordance with the law for an
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-523 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 278
arrest occurring within ten years of the first arrest.
* * *